Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 3. Transfer of Educational Institution Property to School District

§ 3821.
Transfer; acceptance.

An incorporated academy, institute, seminary, or other educational institution, having no capital stock, by vote of at least two-thirds of its directors, trustees, or other governing body, may authorize the transfer of all of its real and personal property, including trust funds, to the school district in which the academy, institute, seminary, or other educational institution is located as provided in this chapter. The school district, at an annual or special meeting of the legal voters warned for the purpose, may vote to accept the transfer of real and personal property, including trust funds, as provided in this chapter to be used for school purposes.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 227, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 3822.
Proceeding in Superior Court.

An incorporated academy, institute, seminary, or other educational institution, and a school district, upon completion of the votes required by section 3821 of this title and before transfer of any property, shall apply to the Superior Court of the county in which the property is located setting forth the votes and any other material facts.

The court shall issue an order stating the substance of the bill and fixing the time and place of hearing. The plaintiff shall cause the order to be published in a newspaper named in the order, three weeks successively, the last publication to be at least 10 days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. The plaintiff shall give further notice as required by the order.

Upon hearing, the court shall determine what portion, if any, of the real and personal property to be transferred is held in trust, may order the transfer of that property subject to the terms of the trust, may make any other orders and decrees for the protection and disposition of the same it deems proper, and shall order the remainder of the real and personal property to be transferred in accordance with the votes authorizing the transfer for use for school purposes.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 228, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 3823.
The Austine School; financing.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Vermont Center for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, which owns and operates the Austine School for the Deaf, and its successors in interest are authorized to mortgage, pledge as collateral, sell, transfer, or otherwise convey any real property associated with the Austine School for the Deaf without consent of the General Assembly.

All State capital appropriations made to or for the benefit of the Austine School for the Deaf prior to or subsequent to June 11, 2003 shall create a first priority lien in favor of the State, unless expressly waived by the General Assembly, provided that this first priority lien shall be subordinate, in an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00, to the interest of any lender to whom the Vermont Center for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing has pledged its real property as collateral pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

If the Vermont Center for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing sells any or all of its real property, then, subject to the subordination provisions of subsection (b) of this section, all State capital appropriations made to or for the benefit of the Austine School shall be repaid to the State, without interest, from any remaining proceeds of the sale.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. June 21, 1994; amended

2003, No. 63

, § 42, eff. June 11, 2003.

§ 3824.
The Austine School for the Deaf; selection of president.

Any president of the Vermont Center for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing selected and hired subsequent to June 11, 2003 shall be selected and hired pursuant to the provisions for employing a superintendent of schools in section 241 of this title. For purposes of this section, the terms “supervisory union,” “supervisory union board,” and “supervisory district board” as used in section 241 shall mean the Board of Trustees of the Vermont Center for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 63

, § 43, eff. June 11, 2003.